Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4412
Behavior technician; prohibited acts.

A behavior technician shall not represent that the technician is a professional behavior analyst and shall use a title that indicates the nonprofessional status, such as Registered Behavior Technician®, behavior technician, or tutor.

A behavior technician shall not design assessment or intervention plans or procedures but may deliver services as assigned by the supervisor responsible for the technician's work as designated by the licensed behavior analyst.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 12.